src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: genta
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: gentu
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: gentu
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: gentu
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: gentur
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: gentum
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: genta
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: gentan
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: gentuna
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: gentuni
    genta+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: gentunnar
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: genturnar
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: gentunum
    genta+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: gentanna
